California statutes. Labor Code
(3) Any corporation which is the issuer of any security which has qualified either by coordination, as provided by Section 25111 of the Corporations Code, or by notification, as provided by Section 25112 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3717.1.

In any claim in which an alleged uninsured employer is a corporation, the director may cause substantial shareholders and parents, as defined by Section 3717, to be joined as parties. Substantial shareholders may be served as provided in this division for service on adverse parties, or if they cannot be found with reasonable diligence, by serving the corporation. The corporation, upon this service, shall notify the shareholder of the service, and mail the served document to him or her at the shareholder’s last address known to the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1547, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

3717.2.

Upon request of the director, the appeals board shall make findings of whether persons are substantial shareholders or parents, as defined in Section 3717. The director may in his or her discretion proceed against substantial shareholders and parents pursuant to Section 3717 without those findings of the appeals board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1547, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

3718.

The cause of action provided in Section 3717 and any cause of action arising out of Section 3722 may be joined in one action against an employer. The amount recovered in such action from such employer shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Uninsured Employers Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

3719.

Any suit, action, proceeding, or award brought or made against any employer under Section 3717 may be compromised by the director, or such suit, action, or proceeding may be prosecuted to final judgment as in the discretion of the director may best subserve the interests of the Uninsured Employers Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

3720.

(a) When the appeals board or the director determines under Section 3715 or 3716 that an employer has not secured the payment of compensation as required by this division or when the director has determined that the employer is prima facie illegally uninsured, the director may file for record in the office of the county recorder in the counties where the employer’s property is possibly located, a certificate of lien showing the date that the employer was determined to be illegally uninsured or the date that the director has determined that the employer was prima facie illegally uninsured. The certificate shall show the name and address of the employer against whom it was filed, and the fact that the employer has not secured the payment of compensation as required by this division. Upon the recordation, the certificate shall constitute a valid lien in favor of the director, and shall have the same force, effect and priority as a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the time of the recording of the certificate unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. A copy of the certificate shall be served upon the employer by mail, by the director. A facsimile signature of the director accompanied by the seal imprint of the department shall be sufficient for recording purposes of liens and releases or cancellations thereof considered herein. Certificates of liens may be filed in any or all counties of the state, depending upon the information the director obtains concerning the employer’s assets.

(b) For purposes of this section, in the event the employer is a corporation, those persons whom either the appeals board finds are the parent or the substantial shareholders of the corporation or its parent, or whom the director finds pursuant to Section 3720.1 to be prima facie the parent or the substantial shareholders of the corporation or its parent, as defined in Section 3717, shall be deemed to be the employer, and the director may file the certificates against those persons.

(c) A person who claims to be aggrieved by the filing of a lien against the property of an uninsured employer because he or she has the same or a similar name, may apply to the director to have filed an amended certificate of lien which shows that the aggrieved applicant is not the uninsured employer which is the subject of the lien. If the director finds that the aggrieved applicant is not the same as the uninsured employer, the director shall file an amended certificate of lien with the county recorder of the county in which the aggrieved applicant has property, which shall show, by reasonably identifying information furnished by the aggrieved applicant, that the uninsured employer and the aggrieved applicant are not the same. If the director does not file the amended certificate of lien within 60 days of application therefor, the applicant may appeal the director’s failure to so find by filing a petition with the appeals board, which shall make a finding as to whether the applicant and the uninsured employer are the same.

(d) Liens filed under this section have continued existence independent of, and may be foreclosed upon independently of, any right of action arising out of Section 3717 or 5806.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3720.1.

(a) In any claim in which the alleged uninsured employer is a corporation, for purposes of filing certificates of lien pursuant to Section 3720, the director may determine, according to the evidence available to him or her, whether a person is prima facie a parent or substantial shareholder, as defined in Section 3717. A finding that a person was prima facie a parent or substantial shareholder shall be made when the director determines that there is sufficient evidence to constitute a prima facie case that the person was a parent or substantial shareholder.

(b) Any person aggrieved by a finding of the director that he or she was prima facie a parent or substantial shareholder may request a hearing on the finding by filing a written request for hearing with the director. The director shall hold a hearing on the matter within 20 days of the receipt of the request for hearing, and shall mail a notice of time and place of hearing to the person requesting hearing at least 10 days prior to the hearing. The hearing officer shall hear and receive evidence, and within 10 days of the hearing, file his or her findings on whether there is sufficient evidence to constitute a prima facie case that the person was a substantial shareholder or parent. The hearing officer shall serve with his or her findings a summary of evidence received and relied upon, and the reasons for the findings. A party may at his or her own expense require that the hearing proceedings be recorded and transcribed.

(c) A party aggrieved by the findings of the hearing officer may within 20 days apply for a writ of mandate to the superior court. Venue shall lie in the county in which is located the office of the director which issued the findings after the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1547, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

3720.2.

(a) In a claim in which the uninsured employer or a substantial shareholder, as determined pursuant to this article, has caused to be recorded in a county a vesting deed conveying an ownership interest in real property after the date of the employee’s injury and prior to the recording of a certificate of lien in the county by the director pursuant to Section 3720, and provided that such property has not subsequently been transferred to a bona fide purchaser, the director may determine according to the evidence available to the director whether the transferor of such real property intended to retain a beneficial interest in the real property, such that a resulting trust for the benefit of the uninsured employer or substantial shareholder was created. A prima facie finding that the transaction created a
 resulting trust for the benefit of the uninsured employer or substantial shareholder may be made when the director determines that there is sufficient evidence to show either of the following circumstances are present:

(1) The recorded vesting deed indicates thereon that the transfer was made as a gift or that no transfer tax to the county was paid.

(2) The transferor made the transfer with actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud collection of reimbursement for funds paid by the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund to or on behalf of an injured worker. A finding made pursuant to this paragraph may be made when at least three or more of the following circumstances are present:

(A) The transfer was to a personal or business associate or a relative by blood, affinity, or marriage of the transferor.

(B) The transferor maintains the real property as a place of residence or business after the transfer.

(C) The transferring parties did not employ an escrow or title company to close the transaction transferring the real property.

(D) The value of the consideration received by the transferor was not reasonably equivalent to the value of the real property transferred.

(E) The transferor failed to attend scheduled hearings and trials of the appeals board after the transfer.

(F) The transferor owns legal title to no other real property in the county.

(b) When the director determines pursuant to subdivision (a) that a transfer of
 real property by the uninsured employer or a substantial shareholder created a resulting trust for the benefit of such transferor, a certificate of lien recorded by the director pursuant to Section 3720 shall attach to that resulting trust in the property and shall constitute a valid lien against the property in favor of the director in the same manner as if the transfer had not occurred.

(c) When the director determines pursuant to subdivision (a) that a transfer created a resulting trust for benefit of the transferor, the director shall mail written notices of the prima facie determination of said resulting trust to the transferor and transferee at their addresses as shown on the recorded vesting deed, the official address record of the appeals board, and to any other more recent addresses the director may have. The notice shall advise the transferring parties of their right to appeal the finding, and that a lien may record and attach against
 the subject real property stating therein that, “THE DIRECTOR HAS MADE A PRIMA FACIE DETERMINATION PURSUANT TO LABOR CODE SECTION 3720.2 THAT THE TRANSFEREE, [FIRST AND LAST NAME], HOLDS TITLE TO THE REAL PROPERTY AT [STREET ADDRESS, CITY AND PARCEL NUMBERS] ON BEHALF OF THE TRANSFEROR, [FIRST AND LAST NAME], IN A RESULTING TRUST” in bold and uppercase letters on the certificate of lien.

(d) A person aggrieved by a prima facie finding of the director pursuant to subdivision (a) that the transferor of the property intended to retain a beneficial interest, such that a resulting trust was created, may request a hearing on the finding by filing a written request for hearing with the director. The director, through a hearing officer appointed by the director, shall hold a hearing on the matter within 20 days of the receipt of the request for hearing and shall mail a notice of time and place of hearing to the person requesting the hearing at least 10
 days prior to the hearing. The hearing officer shall hear and receive evidence, and within 10 days of the hearing, file findings on whether there is sufficient evidence to constitute a prima facie case that the transfer of real property is subject to a resulting trust. The hearing officer shall serve with the findings a summary of evidence received and relied upon and the reasons for the findings. A party may at their own expense require that the hearing proceedings be recorded and transcribed.

(e) A party aggrieved by the findings of the hearing officer may within 20 days apply for a writ of mandate to the superior court. The venue shall lie in the county in which the real property is located.

(f) This section does not affect the interests, priorities, and ownership rights of bona fide encumbrancers and purchasers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 790, Sec. 1.   (SB 847)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3721.

The director shall provide the employer with a certificate of cancellation of lien after the employer has paid to the claimant or to the Uninsured Employers Fund the amount of the compensation or benefits which has been ordered paid to the claimant, or when the application has finally been denied after the claimant has exhausted the remedies provided by law in those cases, or when the employer has filed a bond in the amount and with such surety as the appeals board approves conditioned on the payment of all sums ordered paid to the claimant, or when, after a finding that the employer was prima facie illegally uninsured, it is finally determined that the finding was in error. The recorder shall make no charge for filing the certificates of lien, for filing amended certificates of lien, or for cancellation when liens are filed in error. Cancellation of lien certificates provided to the employer may be filed for recordation by the employer at his or her expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1547, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

3722.

(a) At the time the stop order is issued and served pursuant to Section 3710.1, the director shall also issue and serve a penalty assessment order requiring the uninsured employer to pay to the director, for deposit in the State Treasury to the credit of the Uninsured Employers Fund, the sum of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per employee employed at the time the order is issued and served, as an additional penalty for being uninsured at that time or issue and serve a penalty assessment order pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) At any time that the director determines that an employer has been uninsured for a period in excess of one week during the calendar year preceding the determination, the director shall issue and
 serve a penalty assessment order requiring the uninsured employer to pay to the director, for deposit in the State Treasury to the credit of the Uninsured Employers Fund, the greater of (1) twice the amount the employer would have paid in workers’ compensation premiums during the period the employer was uninsured, determined according to subdivision (c), or (2) the sum of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per employee employed during the period the employer was uninsured. A penalty assessment issued and served by the director pursuant to this subdivision shall be in lieu of, and not in addition to, any other penalty issued and served by the director pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) If the employer is currently insured, or becomes insured during the period during which the penalty under subdivision (b) is being determined, the amount an employer would have paid in workers’ compensation premiums shall be calculated by prorating the
 current premium for the number of weeks the employer was uninsured within the three-year period immediately prior to the date the penalty assessment is issued. If the employer is uninsured at the time the penalty under subdivision (b) is being determined, the amount an employer would have paid in workers’ compensation premiums shall be the product of the employer’s payroll for all periods of time the employer was uninsured within the three-year period immediately prior to the date the penalty assessment is issued multiplied by a rate determined in accordance with regulations that may be adopted by the director or, if none has been adopted, the manual rate or rates of the State Compensation Insurance Fund for the employer’s governing classification pursuant to the standard classification system approved by the Insurance Commissioner. The classification shall be determined by the director or the director’s designee at the time the penalty assessment is issued on the basis of any information available to the
 director regarding the employer’s operations. Unless the amount of the employer’s payroll for all periods during which the employer was uninsured within the three-year period is otherwise proven by a preponderance of evidence, the employer’s payroll for each week the employer was uninsured shall be presumed to be the state average weekly wage multiplied by the number of persons employed by the employer at the time the penalty assessment is issued. For purposes of this subdivision, “state average weekly wage” means the average weekly wage paid by employers to employees covered by unemployment insurance as reported by the United States Department of Labor for California for the 12-month period ending March 31 of the calendar year preceding the year in which the penalty assessment order is issued.

(d) If upon the filing of a claim for compensation under this division the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board finds that any employer has not secured
 the payment of compensation as required by this division and finds the claim either noncompensable or compensable, the appeals board shall mail a copy of their findings to the uninsured employer and the director, together with a direction to the uninsured employer to file a verified statement pursuant to subdivision (e).

After the time for any appeal has expired and the adjudication of the claim has become final, the uninsured employer shall be assessed and pay as a penalty either of the following:

(1) In noncompensable cases, two thousand dollars ($2,000) per each employee employed at the time of the claimed injury.

(2) In compensable cases, ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per each employee employed on the date of the injury.

(e) In order to establish the number of employees
 the uninsured employer had on the date of the claimed injury in noncompensable cases and on the date of injury in compensable cases, the employer shall submit to the director within 10 days after service of findings, awards, and orders of the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board a verified statement of the number of employees in his or her employ on the date of injury. If the employer fails to submit to the director this verified statement or if the director disputes the accuracy of the number of employees reported by the employer, the director shall use any information regarding the number of employees as the director may have or otherwise obtains.

(f) Except for penalties assessed under subdivision (b), the maximum amount of penalties which may be assessed pursuant to this section is one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). Payment shall be transmitted to the director for deposit in the State Treasury to the credit of the Uninsured Employers
 Fund.

(g) (1) The Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board may provide for a summary hearing on the sole issue of compensation coverage to effect the provisions of this section.

(2) In the event a claim is settled by the director pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3715 by means of a compromise and release or stipulations with request for award, the appeals board may also provide for a summary hearing on the issue of compensability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 640, Sec. 1.   (SB 313)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Note: Because Ch. 640 was chaptered on November 2, 2009, its effective date is January 1, 2011, not January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3725.

If an employer desires to contest a penalty assessment order, the employer shall file with the director a written request for a hearing within 15 days after service of the order. Upon receipt of the request, the director shall set the matter for a hearing within 30 days thereafter and shall notify the employer of the time and place of the hearing by mail at least 10 days prior to the date of the hearing. The decision of the director shall consist of a notice of findings and findings which shall be served on all parties to the hearing by registered or certified mail within 15 days after the hearing. Any amount found due by the director as a result of a hearing shall become due and payable 45 days after notice of the findings and written findings have been mailed by registered or certified mail to the party assessed. A writ of mandate may be taken from these findings to the appropriate superior court upon the execution by the party assessed of a bond to the state in double the amount found due and ordered paid by the director, as long as the party agrees to pay any judgment and costs rendered against the party for the assessment. The writ shall be taken within 45 days after mailing the notice of findings and findings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 96, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

3726.

(a) When no petition objecting to a penalty assessment order is filed, a certified copy of the order may be filed by the director in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the employer has property or in which the employer has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon such filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the employer in the amount shown on the penalty assessment order.

(b) When findings are made affirming or modifying a penalty assessment order after hearing, a certified copy of such order and a certified copy of such findings may be filed by the director in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the employer has property or in which the employer has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon such filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the employer in the amount shown on the penalty assessment order or in the amount shown in the findings if the order has been modified.

(c) A judgment entered pursuant to the provisions of this section may be filed by the clerk in a looseleaf book entitled “Special Judgments for State Uninsured Employers Fund.” Such judgment shall bear the same rate of interest and shall have the same effect as other judgments and be given the same preference allowed by law on other judgments rendered for claims for taxes. The clerk shall make no charge for the service provided by this section to be performed by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

3727.

If the director determines pursuant to Section 3722 that an employer has failed to secure the payment of compensation as required by this division, the director may file with the county recorder of any counties in which such employer’s property may be located his certificate of the amount of penalty due from such employer and such amount shall be a lien in favor of the director from the date of such filing against the real property and personal property of the employer within the county in which such certificate is filed. The recorder shall accept and file such certificate and record the same as a mortgage on real estate and shall file the same as a security interest and he shall index the same as mortgage on real estate and as a security interest. Certificates of liens may be filed in any and all counties of the state, depending upon the information the director obtains concerning the employer’s assets. The recorder shall make no charge for the services provided by this section to be performed by him. Upon payment of the penalty assessment, the director shall issue a certificate of cancellation of penalty assessment, which may be recorded by the employer at his expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

3727.1.

The director may withdraw a stop order or a penalty assessment order where investigation reveals the employer had secured the payment of compensation as required by Section 3700 on the date and at the time of service of such order. The director also may withdraw a penalty assessment order where investigation discloses that the employer was insured on the date and at the time of an injury or claimed injury, or where an insured employer responded in writing to a request to furnish the status of his workers’ compensation coverage within the time prescribed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

3728.

(a) The director may draw from the State Treasury out of the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund for the purposes of Sections 3716 and 3716.1, without at the time presenting vouchers and itemized statements, a sum not to exceed in the aggregate the level provided for pursuant to Section 16400 of the Government Code, to be used as a cash revolving fund. The revolving fund shall be deposited in any banks and under any conditions as the Department of General Services determines. The Controller shall draw his or her warrants in favor of the Director of Industrial Relations for the amounts so withdrawn and the Treasurer shall pay these warrants.

(b) Expenditures made from the revolving fund in payment of claims for compensation due from the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund and from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund for administrative and adjusting services rendered are exempted from the operation of Section 925.6 of the Government Code. Reimbursement of the revolving fund from the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund or the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund for expenditures shall be made upon presentation to the Controller of an abstract or statement of the expenditures. The abstract or statement shall be in any form as the Controller requires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 228, Sec. 30.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3730.

When the last day for filing any instrument or other document pursuant to this chapter falls upon a Saturday, Sunday or other holiday, such act may be performed upon the next business day with the same effect as if it had been performed upon the day appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

3731.

Any stop order or penalty assessment order may be personally served upon the employer either by (1) manual delivery of the order to the employer personally or by (2) leaving signed copies of the order during usual office hours with the person who is apparently in charge of the office and by thereafter mailing copies of the order by first class mail, postage prepaid to the employer at the place where signed copies of the order were left.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

3732.

(a) If compensation is paid or becomes payable from the Uninsured Employers Fund, whether as a result of a findings and award, award based upon stipulations, compromise and release executed on behalf of the director, or payments voluntarily furnished by the director pursuant to Section 4903.3, the director may recover damages from any person or entity, other than the employer, whose tortious act or omission proximately caused the injury or death of the employee. The damages shall include any compensation, including additional compensation by way of interest or penalty, paid or payable by the director, plus the expense incurred by the director in investigating and litigating the workers’ compensation claim and a reasonable attorney fee for litigating the workers’ compensation claim. The director may compromise, or settle and release any claim, and may waive any claim, including the lien allowed by this section, in whole or in part, for the convenience of the director.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 3850) of Part 1 of Division 4 shall be applicable to these actions, the director being treated as an employer within the meaning of Chapter 5 to the extent not inconsistent with this section.

(c) Actions brought under this section shall be commenced within one year after the later of either the time the director pays or the time the director becomes obligated to pay any compensation from the Uninsured Employers Fund.

(d) In the trial of these actions, any negligence attributable to the employer shall not be imputed to the director or to the Uninsured Employers Fund, and the damages recoverable by the director shall not be reduced by any percentage of fault or negligence attributable to the employer or to the employee.

(e) In determining the credit to the Uninsured Employers Fund provided by Section 3861, the appeals board shall not take into consideration any negligence of the employer, but shall allow a credit for the entire amount of the employee’s recovery either by settlement or after judgment, as has not theretofore been applied to the payment of expenses or attorney’s fees.

(f) When an action or claim is brought by an employee, his or her guardian, conservator, personal representative, estate, survivors, or heirs against a third party who may be liable for causing the injury or death of the employee, any settlement or judgment obtained is subject to the director’s claim for damages recoverable by the director pursuant to subdivision (a), and the director shall have a lien against any settlement in the amount of the damages.

(g) No judgment or settlement in any action or claim by an employee, his or her guardian, conservator, personal representative, survivors, or heirs to recover damages for injuries, where the director has an interest, shall be satisfied without first giving the director notice and a reasonable opportunity to perfect and satisfy his or her lien. The director shall be mailed a copy of the complaint in the third-party action as soon as reasonable after it is filed with the court.

(h) When the director has perfected a lien upon a judgment or settlement in favor of an employee, his or her guardian, conservator, personal representative, survivors or heirs against any third party, the director shall be entitled to a writ of execution as a lien claimant to enforce payment of the lien against the third party with interest and other accruing costs as in the case of other executions. In the event the amount of the judgment or settlement so recovered has been paid to the employee, his or her guardian, conservator, personal representative, survivors, or heirs, the director shall be entitled to a writ of execution against the employee, his or her guardian, conservator, personal representative, survivors, or heirs to the extent of the director’s lien, with interest and other accruing costs as in the cost of other executions.

(i) Except as otherwise provided in this section, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the entire amount of any settlement of the action or claim of the employee, his or her guardian, conservator, personal representative, survivors, or heirs, with or without suit, is subject to the director’s lien claim for the damages recoverable by the director pursuant to subdivision (a).

(j) Where the action or claim is brought by the employee, his or her guardian, conservator, personal representative, estate, survivors, or heirs, and the director has not joined in the action, and the employee, his or her guardian, conservator, personal representative, estate, survivors, or heirs incur a personal liability to pay attorney’s fees and costs of litigation, the director’s claim for damages shall be limited to the amount of the director’s claim for damages less that portion of the costs of litigation expenses determined by multiplying the total cost of litigation expenses by the ratio of the full amount of the director’s claim for damages to the full amount of the judgment, award, or settlement, and less 25 percent of the balance after subtracting the director’s share of litigation expenses, which represents the director’s reasonable share of attorney’s fees incurred.

(k) In the trial of the director’s action for damages, and in the allowance of his or her lien in an action by the employee, guardian, executor, personal representative, survivors, or heirs, the compensation paid from the Uninsured Employers Fund pursuant to an award as provided in Section 3716 is conclusively presumed to be reasonable in amount and to be proximately caused by the event or events which caused the employee’s injury or death.

(l) In the action for damages the director shall be entitled to recover, if he or she prevails, the entire amount of the damages recoverable by the director pursuant to subdivision (a), regardless of whether the damages recoverable by the employee, guardian, conservator, personal representative, survivors, or heirs are of lesser amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 461, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

3733.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best interest of the State of California to provide a person, regardless of his or her citizenship or immigration status, with the benefits provided pursuant to this article, and therefore enacts this section pursuant to Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) A person shall not be prohibited from receiving compensation paid or payable from the Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund solely because of his or her citizenship or immigration status.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to override Section 15740 of Article 1 of
 Subchapter 2.1.1 of Chapter 8 of Division 1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) The provisions of this section are declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 290, Sec. 1.   (SB 623)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Self-Insurers’ Security Fund [3740. - 3747.]

3740.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article and Article 1 (commencing with Section 3700) to provide for the continuation of workers’ compensation benefits delayed due to the failure of a private self-insured employer to meet its compensation obligations when the employers’ security deposit is either inadequate or not immediately accessible for the payment of benefits. With respect to the continued liability of a surety for claims that arose under a bond after termination of that bond and to a surety’s liability for the cost of administration of claims, it is the intent of the Legislature to clarify existing law. The Legislature finds and declares that the establishment of the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund is a necessary component of a complete system of workers’ compensation, required by Section 4 of Article XIV of the California Constitution, to have adequate provisions for the comfort, health and safety, and general welfare of any and all workers and their dependents to the extent of relieving the consequences of any industrial injury or death, and full provision for securing the payment of compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1128, Sec. 15.   Effective September 25, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3741.

As used in this article:

(a) “Director” means the Director of Industrial Relations.

(b) “Private self-insurer” means a private employer which has secured the payment of compensation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3700.

(c) “Insolvent self-insurer” means a private self-insurer who has failed to pay compensation and whose security deposit has been called by the director pursuant to Section 3701.5.

(d) “Fund” means the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund established pursuant to Section 3742.

(e) “Trustees” means the Board of Trustees of the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund.

(f) “Member” means a private self-insurer which participates in the Self-Insurers’ Security Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 252, Sec. 5.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3742.

(a) The Self-Insurers’ Security Fund shall be established as a Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code and this article. If any provision of the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law conflicts with any provision of this article, the provisions of this article shall apply. Each private self-insurer shall participate as a member in the fund, unless its liabilities have been turned over to the fund pursuant to Section 3701.5, at which time its membership in the fund is relinquished.

(b) The fund shall be governed by a board of trustees with no more than eight members, as established by the bylaws of the Self-Insurers’ Security
 Fund. The director shall hold ex officio status, with full powers equal to those of a trustee, except that the director shall not have a vote. The director, or a delegate authorized in writing to act as the director’s representative on the board of trustees, shall carry out exclusively the responsibilities set forth in Division 1 (commencing with Section 50) through Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and shall not have the obligations of a trustee under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law. The fund shall adopt bylaws to segregate the director from all matters that may involve fund litigation against the department or fund participation in legal proceedings before the director. Although not voting, the director or a delegate authorized in writing to represent the director, shall be counted toward a quorum of trustees. The remaining trustees shall be representatives of private self-insurers. The self-insurer trustees shall be elected by the members of the fund, each member having one vote.
 Trustees shall be elected to four-year terms, and shall serve until their successors are elected and assume office pursuant to the bylaws of the fund.

(c) The fund shall establish bylaws as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this article and to carry out the responsibilities of the fund, including, but not limited to, any obligations imposed by the director pursuant to Section 3701.8. The fund may carry out its responsibilities directly or by contract, and may purchase services and insurance and borrow funds as it deems necessary for the protection of the members and their employees. The fund may receive confidential information concerning the financial condition of self-insured employers whose liabilities to pay compensation may devolve upon it and shall adopt bylaws to prevent dissemination of that information.

(d) The director may also require fund members to subscribe
 to financial instruments or guarantees to be posted with the director in order to satisfy the security requirements set by the director pursuant to Section 3701.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 23.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3743.

(a) Upon order of the director pursuant to Section 3701.5, the fund shall assume the workers’ compensation obligations of an insolvent self-insurer.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the fund shall not be liable for the payment of any penalties assessed for any act or omission on the part of any person other than the fund, including, but not limited to, the penalties provided in Section 132a, 3706, 4553, 4554, 4556, 4557, 4558, 4601.5, 5814, or 5814.1.

(c) The fund shall be a party in interest in all proceedings involving compensation claims against an insolvent self-insurer whose compensation obligations have been paid or assumed by the fund. The fund shall have the same rights and defenses as the insolvent self-insurer, including, but not limited to, all of the following:
